Nebraska, session 109, LB1053.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1053 LB1053
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 79-263, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-263 (1) Each Except as provided in section 79-265.01, each school
district shall adopt a policy requiring the expulsion from school for a
period of not less than one year of any student who is determined to have
knowingly and intentionally possessed, used, or transmitted a firearm on
school grounds, in a vehicle owned, leased, or contracted by a school
being used for a school purpose or in a vehicle being driven for a school
purpose by a school employee or his or her designee, or at a school-
sponsored activity or athletic event. For purposes of this section,
firearm means a firearm as defined in 18 U.S.C. 921. The policy shall
authorize the superintendent or the school board or board of education to
modify the expulsion requirement on an individual basis.
(2) Each school district shall provide annually to the State
Department of Education:
(a) An assurance that the school district has in effect the policy
required by subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) A description of the circumstances surrounding any expulsions
imposed under the policy required by subsection (1) of this section,
including:
(i) The name of the school concerned;
(ii) The number of students expelled from the school; and
(iii) The types of weapons concerned.
Sec. 2. Section 79-265, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-265 (1) The Except as provided in section 79-265.01, the
principal may deny any student the right to attend school or to take part
in any school function for a period of up to five school days on the
following grounds:
(a) Conduct constituting grounds for expulsion as set out in the
Student Discipline Act; or
-2-

LB1053 LB1053
2026 2026
(b) Any other violation of rules and standards of behavior adopted
under the act.
(2) Such short-term suspension shall be made only after the
principal has made an investigation of the alleged conduct or violation
and has determined that such suspension is necessary to help any student,
to further school purposes, or to prevent an interference with school
purposes.
(3) Before such short-term suspension takes effect, the student
shall be given oral or written notice of the charges against him or her,
an explanation of the evidence the authorities have, and an opportunity
to present his or her version.
(4) Within twenty-four hours or such additional time as is
reasonably necessary, not to exceed an additional forty-eight hours,
following such suspension, the principal shall send a written statement
to the student and his or her parent or guardian describing the student's
conduct, misconduct, or violation of the rule or standard and the reasons
for the action taken. The principal shall make a reasonable effort to
hold a conference with the parent or guardian before or at the time the
student returns to school and shall document such effort in writing.
Sec. 3. Section 79-267, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-267 The Except as provided in section 79-265.01, the following
student conduct shall constitute grounds for long-term suspension,
expulsion, or mandatory reassignment, subject to the procedural
provisions of the Student Discipline Act, when such activity occurs on
school grounds, in a vehicle owned, leased, or contracted by a school
being used for a school purpose or in a vehicle being driven for a school
purpose by a school employee or by his or her designee, or at a school-
sponsored activity or athletic event:
(1) Use of violence, force, coercion, threat, intimidation, or
similar conduct in a manner that constitutes a substantial interference
-3-

LB1053 LB1053
2026 2026
with school purposes;
(2) Willfully causing or attempting to cause substantial damage to
property, stealing or attempting to steal property of substantial value,
or repeated damage or theft involving property;
(3) Causing or attempting to cause personal injury to a school
employee, to a school volunteer, or to any student. Personal injury
caused by accident, self-defense, or other action undertaken on the
reasonable belief that it was necessary to protect some other person
shall not constitute a violation of this subdivision;
(4) Threatening or intimidating any student for the purpose of or
with the intent of obtaining money or anything of value from such
student;
(5) Knowingly possessing, handling, or transmitting any object or
material that is ordinarily or generally considered a weapon;
(6) Engaging in the unlawful possession, selling, dispensing, or use
of a controlled substance or an imitation controlled substance, as
defined in section 28-401, a substance represented to be a controlled
substance, or alcoholic liquor as defined in section 53-103.02 or being
under the influence of a controlled substance or alcoholic liquor;
(7) Public indecency as defined in section 28-806, except that this
subdivision shall apply only to students at least twelve years of age but
less than nineteen years of age;
(8) Engaging in bullying as defined in section 79-2,137;
(9) Sexually assaulting or attempting to sexually assault any person
if a complaint has been filed by a prosecutor in a court of competent
jurisdiction alleging that the student has sexually assaulted or
attempted to sexually assault any person, including sexual assaults or
attempted sexual assaults which occur off school grounds not at a school
function, activity, or event. For purposes of this subdivision, sexual
assault means sexual assault in the first degree as defined in section
28-319, sexual assault in the second degree as defined in section 28-320,
-4-

LB1053 LB1053
2026 2026
sexual assault of a child in the second or third degree as defined in
section 28-320.01, or sexual assault of a child in the first degree as
defined in section 28-319.01, as such sections now provide or may
hereafter from time to time be amended;
(10) Engaging in any other activity forbidden by the laws of the
State of Nebraska which activity constitutes a danger to other students
or interferes with school purposes; or
(11) A repeated violation of any rules and standards validly
established pursuant to section 79-262 if such violations constitute a
substantial interference with school purposes.
It is the intent of the Legislature that alternatives to suspension
or expulsion be imposed against a student who is truant, tardy, or
otherwise absent from required school activities.
Sec. 4. Original sections 79-263, 79-265, and 79-267, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 5. The following section is outright repealed: Section
79-265.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-5-